Utah statutes.
31A-13-104.   Commissioner to file information.
The commissioner may collect and file for public inspection the forms of trust
indentures in use, the commission and fee schedules adopted by insurers, the
compensation paid to trustees of employee welfare funds, and other matters
affecting the establishment and administration of the funds the commissioner
determines are in the public interest.
